Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 12.
CONSERVATION AND

RESOURCES

Subtitle 1. Public Lands

Chapter

171 Public Lands, Management and Disposition of

171C Public Land Development Corporation--Repealed

172 Land Commission Awards; Surveys

173 Reclamation of Lands

173A Acquisition of Resource Value Lands

Subtitle 2. Water and Land Development;
Flood Control

174 Water and Land Development

174C State Water Code

175 Molokai Irrigation and Water Utilization
Project--

Repealed

176 Water Resources--Repealed

176D Protection of Instream Uses of
Water--Repealed

177 Ground-Water Use--Repealed

178 Wells, Generally--Repealed

179 Flood Control and Flood Water Conservation

179D Dams and Reservoirs

180 Soil and Water Conservation Districts

180C Soil Erosion and Sediment Control

Subtitle 3. Mining and Minerals

181 Strip Mining

182 Reservation and Disposition of Government
Mineral Rights

Subtitle 4. Forestry and Wildlife;
Recreation Areas;

Fire Protection

183 Forest Reserves, Water Development, Zoning

183B Hawaiian Fishponds

183C Conservation District

183D Wildlife

184 State Parks and Recreation Areas

185 Land Fire Protection Law

186 Tree Farms

Subtitle 5. Aquatic Resources and
Wildlife

187 General Provisions Relating to Aquatic
Resources and

Wildlife--Repealed

187A Aquatic Resources

188 Fishing Rights and Regulations

188E Hawaii Fisheries Coordinating
Council--Repealed

188F West Hawaii Regional Fishery Management Area

189 Commercial Fishing

189G Aquaculture Advisory Council--Repealed

190 Marine Life Conservation Program

190D Ocean and Submerged Lands Leasing

191 Birds and Mammals--Repealed

192 Shooting Preserves and Game Bird
Farming--Repealed

Subtitle 6. General and Miscellaneous
Programs

193 Conservation: Employment Programs

194 Invasive Species Council

195 Natural Area Reserves System

195D Conservation of Aquatic Life, Wildlife, and
Land Plants

195F Forest Stewardship

196 Energy Resources

196D Geothermal and Cable System Development

197 General Provisions Relating to Aquatic
Resources and

Wildlife

198 Conservation Easements

198D Hawaii Statewide Trail and Access System

Subtitle 7. Enforcement

199 Conservation and Resources Enforcement
Program

199D Civil Natural Resource Violations Act

Subtitle 8. Ocean Recreation and Coastal
Areas

200 Ocean Recreation and Coastal Areas Programs

200D Kaneohe Bay Regional Council

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 to the following
chapters is not included in this Supplement: 173, 174, 179, 180, 180C, 183,
183B, 185, 186, 188F, 190, 190D, 193, 195, 195F, 196, 197, 198D, 199D, and
200D.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this title, see §604A-2.

SUBTITLE 1.
PUBLIC LANDS

CHAPTER
171

PUBLIC
LANDS, MANAGEMENT AND DISPOSITION OF

Part I. General Provisions

Section

171-1 Definitions

171-2 Definition of public lands

171-3 Department of land and natural resources

171-4 Board of land and natural resources; terms
and

qualifications of members of the board;
organization;

expenses

171-4.5 Aha moku advisory committee; established

171-5 Meetings, regular, special; quorum

171-6 Powers

171-6.4 General administrative penalties

171-6.5 Repealed

171-7 General duties of the board

171-8 Land agents and other employees

171-8.5 Koke‘e state park advisory council

171-8.6 Risk assessment working group

171-9 Land districts

171-10 Classes of lands

171-11 Public purposes, lands set aside by the
governor;

management

171-12 Permanent register of applicants for
public lands

171-13 Disposition of public lands

171-14 Auction

171-14.5 Auction pre-qualification; agricultural
and pasture

leases

171-15 Drawing

171-16 Notices

171-17 Appraisals

171-18 Public land trust

171-18.5 Sugarcane lands conveyed for the development
of

housing projects

171-19 Special land and development fund

171-19.5 Repealed

171-20 Notice of breach or default

171-21 Rights of holder of security interest

171-22 Consent to mortgage

171-23 Land patents and deeds, issued when

171-24 Land conveyances, preparation, signing,
record, copies

171-25 Irrigation projects

171-26 Rights-of-way to the sea, game management
areas, and

public hunting areas

171-27 Taxes

171-28 Government-owned Hawaiian fishponds; sale
prohibition

171-29 Report to legislature on all dispositions

171-30 Acquisition of real property; general

171-31 Depository for documents; filing, record

171-31.5 Disposition of abandoned or seized
property

171-31.6 Criminal penalties

Part II. Dispositions, Generally

A. Policy and Planning

171-32 Policy

171-33 Planning; generally

171-34 Planning; intensive agricultural and
pasture uses

B. Leases or Sales

171-35 Lease provisions; generally

171-36 Lease restrictions; generally

171-36.1 Reservation of rights to prehistoric and
historic

remains on leased public lands

171-36.2 Public lands for historic preservation and

restoration

171-37 Lease restrictions; intensive agricultural
and

pasture uses

171-37.5 Withdrawal or taking of leased land; fair
compensation

171-38 Condemnation of leases

171-39 Leases; forfeiture

171-40 Expired leases; holdover

171-41 Commercial, industrial, and other business
uses

171-41.5 Amendment of commercial, hotel, or
industrial lease

171-42 Hotel and resort uses

171-43 Lease of campsites or sites for youth
athletic and/or

educational activities

171-43.1 Lease to eleemosynary organizations

171-44 Lease for recreation-residence use

C. Residential Uses

171-45 Residence lots; sale or leases

171-46 Residential sales or leases; planning

171-47 Residence lots; improvement districts

171-48 Residence lots, requirements

171-49 Residence lots: unsold; forfeited;
surrendered

171-49.5 Resale, first offer to board; limitation
on resale

price

171-49.7 Public lands suitable and available for
residential

development; inventory

D. Miscellaneous

171-50 Exchanges

171-50.1 Acquisition of lands for exchange under
chapter 516

171-50.2 Exchanges for conversion of leasehold
lands to fee

simple ownership

171-51 Quitclaim

171-52 Remnant

171-53 Reclamation and disposition of submerged
or reclaimed

public land

171-54 Land license

171-55 Permits

171-55.5 Agricultural plots

171-56 Contract or license for concessions or
concession

space

171-57 Reserved rights and easements

171-58 Minerals and water rights

171-58.5 Prohibitions

171-59 Disposition by negotiation

171-60 Development through private developer

171-61 Cancellation, surrender

171-62 Sales; payment, default

171-63 Waiver of restrictions

171-64 Covenants against discrimination

171-64.5 Nonconventional uses; department of
health;

approval and authorization; Waimano ridge

171-64.7 Legislative approval of sale or gift of
lands

Part III. Special Dispositions; Sales and
Leases

Permitted Without Public Auction

A. Certain Agricultural Uses, Including
Special

Livestock and Pasture

171-65 Leases, leases with option to purchase,
sales

permitted; when

171-66 Planning

171-67 Restrictions; conditions

171-68 Applicants; qualifications of

171-69 Preference right

B. Residential Leases

171-70 Findings and declaration of necessity

171-71 Definitions

171-72 Subdivision, improvement and lease of
public lands

171-73 Term, rent, and other conditions of
residential leases

171-74 Qualifications of lessees

171-75 Persons disqualified to take residential
leases

171-76 Preference right to residential lease

171-77 Transfers of title by bequest, devise,
intestate

succession, or by operation of law, and
upon

foreclosure

171-78 Notice; drawing

171-79 Purchase of fee title by lessee

171-80 Cancellation of leases

171-81 Surrender of lease

171-82 Approval by board

171-83 Costs of, and realization from,
residential leasing

171-84 Leases to certain developers of housing
for low and

moderate income families

C. Disposition to Victims of Natural
Disaster

1. Disposition for Other Than
Residential or

Agricultural Purposes

171-85 Definitions

171-86 Purpose

171-87 Disposition to victims of natural
disaster, when

171-88 Option to purchase

171-89 Applications

171-90 Eligibility

171-91 Notice of availability of leases;
selection of lessees

171-92 Existing public leases

2. Disposition for Residential Purposes

171-93 Authorization

171-94 Persons dispossessed or displaced

D. Disposition to Government Agencies and
Public

Utilities

171-95 Disposition to governments, governmental
agencies,

public utilities, and renewable energy
producers

171-95.3 Renewable energy producers; lease of
public lands

without public auction

171-95.5 Lease to public charter schools

171-96 Lease to foreign governments

Part IV. Relating to Existing Homestead
Rights;

Continuation Thereof and Removal
of Certain

Restrictions

171-97 Definition

171-98 Release of restrictions

171-99 Continuation of rights under existing
homestead

leases, certificates of occupation, right
of purchase

leases, and cash freehold agreements

171-100 Successor determination program

Part V. Lands for Agricultural Purposes

171-111 Repealed

171-112 Acquisition

171-113 to 116.5 Repealed

171-117 Public lands; agricultural park lands

171-118 Repealed

Part VI. Economic Development

171-121 Molokai forest lands, management program
established

Part VII. Industrial Parks

171-131 Definitions

171-132 Designation of industrial park

171-133 Authority to plan, improve, develop,
operate, and

maintain industrial parks

171-134 Industrial park development

171-135 Joint venture or development agreement

171-136 Disposition of public lands within
industrial park

171-137 Preference

171-138 Repealed

171-139 Acquisition

171-140 Rules

171-141 Lease for eligible permittee in industrial
park

171-142 Lease for lessees dislocated by
condemnation

proceedings

171-143 Rate policy

171-144 Issuance of revenue bonds

Part VIII. Restoration of Beach Lands

171-151 Definitions

171-152 General powers

171-153 Beach restoration plan

171-154 Authority to lease coastal lands

171-155 Development of public coastal lands

171-156 Beach restoration special fund

[Part IX. Turtle Bay, Oahu]

171-171 Reimbursable general obligation bonds for

conservation easement and other real
property

interests in Turtle Bay, Oahu

171-172 Turtle Bay conservation easement special
fund

171-173 Turtle Bay appraisal and due diligence

171-174 Lease of Turtle Bay lands

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of part II of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012,
c 218.

Development of watershed management strategies by University
of Hawaii in at least two of Hawaii's most severely flood-impacted watersheds.
L 2006, c 187.

Kakaako makai; conveyance of certain parcels to office of
Hawaiian affairs. L 2012, c 15.

Priority mooring space for intra-county ferry service. L
2008, c 57, §2.

Relief for airport concessionaires (repealed July 1, 2013). L
Sp 2009, c 33; L 2011, c 104, §2.

State purchase of private lands subject to approval. L 2015,
c 119, §105.

Survey to identify potential historic districts and
single-family residences for listing on Hawaii register of historic places;
report to 2018 legislature. L 2015, c 89, §1.

Use of lands in public land trust; payments and accounting
requirements. L 2006, c 178.

Water rights lease applications; annual reports to 2017-2020
legislature. L 2016, c 126, §2.

Cross References

Ala Wai boat harbor; leases, see §200-2.6.

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Conclusive presumptions relating to duty of public entities
to warn of dangers at public beach parks, see §663-1.56.

Disposition of state boating facility properties, see
§200-2.5.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Exception to liability for county lifeguard services, see §663-1.52.

Kaho‘olawe island reserve, see chapter 6K.

Koke‘e state park advisory council, see §171-8.5.

State facility renovation partnership program, see chapter
107D.

Transfer of non-agricultural park lands classified for
agricultural use to department of agriculture, see chapter 166E.

Attorney General Opinions

Applies to any and all "public lands", including
ceded lands or lands acquired by the State by other means. Att. Gen. Op. 95-3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Native Hawaiians, Self-Determination, and the Inadequacy of
the State Land Trusts. 14 UH L. Rev. 519.

Demolition of Native Rights and Self Determination: Act 55's
Devastating Impact through the Development of Hawaii's Public Lands. 35 UH L.
Rev. 297 (2013).

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next